pt-BR: Tipo de gravador: DVR; Codificador/multiplexador; Híbrido (XVR); NVR; Outro
ru: Тип регистратора: Цифровой видеорегистратор; Кодировщик/мультиплексор; Гибридный видеорегистратор; Сетевой видеорегистратор; Другое
sv: Typ av inspelare: DVR; Kodare/multiplexer; Hybrid (XVR); NVR; Övrigt
zh-TW: 錄影機類型: DVR; 編碼器/多工器; 混合式 (XVR); NVR; 其他
hu: Felvevő típusa: DVR; Kódoló/multiplexer; Hibrid (XVR); NVR; Egyéb
zh-CN: 录像机类型: 数字录像机; 编码器/多路复用器; 混合式 (XVR); 网络录像机; 其他
it: Tipo di registratore: Registratore digitale; Codificatore/multiplexer; Ibrido (XVR); Videoregistratore digitale; Altro
sl-SI: Vrsta snemalnika: DVR; Dajalnik/multiplekser; Hibridni (XVR); Snemalni videorekorder; Druga
en: Recorder type: DVR; Encoder/multiplexer; Hybrid (XVR); NVR; Other
el: Τύπος συσκευής εγγραφής: DVR; Κωδικοποιητής/πολυπλεκτής; Υβριδικό (XVR); NVR; Άλλο
tr: Kaydedici türü: DVR; Kodlayıcı/çoklayıcı; Hibrit (XVR); NVR; Diğer
ko: 레코더 유형: DVR; 인코더/멀티플렉서; 하이브리드(XVR); NVR; 기타
da: Optagertype: DVR; Encoder/multiplexer; Hybrid (XVR); NVR; Andet
nl: Recordertype: DVR; Encoder/multiplexer; Hybride (XVR); NVR; Overig
hr-HR: Vrsta snimača: DVR; Enkoder/multiplekser; Hibridni (XVR); NVR; Ostalo
ja: レコーダーの種類: DVR; エンコーダ/マルチプレクサ; ハイブリッド（XVR）; NVR; その他
th: ประเภทเครื่องบันทึก: เครื่องบันทึกวิดีโอดิจิทัล (DVR); ตัวเข้ารหัส/ตัวรวมสัญญาณ; ไฮบริด (XVR); เครื่องบันทึกวิดีโอเครือข่าย (NVR); อื่นๆ
de: Rekordertyp: DVR; Encoder/Multiplexer; Hybrid (XVR); NVR; Sonstiges
pt-PT: Tipo de gravador: Gravador de vídeo digital; Codificador/multiplexador; Híbrido (XVR); NVR; Outro
sk-SK: Typ rekordéra: DVR; Kódovač/multiplexor; Hybridný (XVR); NVR; Iné
lt-LT: Įrašymo įrenginio tipas: Vaizdo įrašymo įrenginys; Kodavimo įrenginys / multiplekseris; Hibridinis (XVR); NVR; Kita
fi: Tallentimen tyyppi: DVR-tallennin; Enkooderi/multiplekseri; Hybridi (XVR); NVR; Muu
fr: Type d’enregistreur: DVR; Encodeur/multiplexeur; Hybride (XVR); NVR; Autre
ro-RO: Tipul de înregistrator: DVR; Codificator/multiplexor; Hibrid (XVR); NVR; Altele
bg-BG: Тип рекордер: DVR; Енкодер/мултиплексор; Хибридно (XVR); NVR; Друго
cs: Typ rekordéru: DVR; Kodér/multiplexor; Hybridní (XVR); NVR; Jiné
vi: Loại thiết bị ghi hình: Đầu ghi video kỹ thuật số; Bộ mã hóa/bộ dồn kênh; Đầu ghi hỗn hợp (XVR); Đầu ghi video mạng; Khác
pl: Typ rejestratora: Rejestrator DVR; Enkoder / multiplekser; Hybrydowy (XVR); Rejestrator NVR; Inne
nb: Opptakertype: DVR-en; Enkoder/multiplekser; Hybrid (XVR); NVR; Annet
es: Tipo de grabadora: DVR; Codificador/multiplexor; Híbrido (XVR); Grabadora de vídeo en red (NVR); Otros